src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/POST-puna_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Postposition - пу-: # Noun 'after' - full paradigm 

     пуна+POSTP_Dat: пуʼ
     пуна+POSTP_Loc: пуна
     пуна+POSTP_Abl: пуд
     пуна+POSTP_Pros: пумна

# Possessive forms 

     пуна+POSTP_Dat+PxSg1: пун
     пуна+POSTP_Dat+PxSg2: пунд
     пуна+POSTP_Dat+PxSg3: пунда 
     пуна+POSTP_Dat+PxDu1: пуниʼ
     пуна+POSTP_Dat+PxDu2: пундиʼ
     пуна+POSTP_Dat+PxDu3: пундиʼ
     пуна+POSTP_Dat+PxPl1: пунаˮ
     пуна+POSTP_Dat+PxPl2: пундаˮ
     пуна+POSTP_Dat+PxPl3: пундоʼ
     
     пуна+POSTP_Loc+PxSg1: пунан
     пуна+POSTP_Loc+PxSg2: пунанд 
     пуна+POSTP_Loc+PxSg3: пунанда 
     пуна+POSTP_Loc+PxDu1: пунаниʼ
     пуна+POSTP_Loc+PxDu2: пунариʼ
     пуна+POSTP_Loc+PxDu3: пунадиʼ
     пуна+POSTP_Loc+PxPl1: пунаваˮ
     пуна+POSTP_Loc+PxPl2: пунараˮ
     пуна+POSTP_Loc+PxPl3: пунадоʼ
     
     пуна+POSTP_Abl+PxSg1: пудан
     пуна+POSTP_Abl+PxSg2: пуданд 
     пуна+POSTP_Abl+PxSg3: пуданда 
     пуна+POSTP_Abl+PxDu1: пуданиʼ
     пуна+POSTP_Abl+PxDu2: пудандиʼ
     пуна+POSTP_Abl+PxDu3: пудандиʼ
     пуна+POSTP_Abl+PxPl1: пуданаˮ
     пуна+POSTP_Abl+PxPl2: пудандаˮ
     пуна+POSTP_Abl+PxPl3: пудадоʼ
     
     пуна+POSTP_Pros+PxSg1: пумнан
     пуна+POSTP_Pros+PxSg2: пумнанд 
     пуна+POSTP_Pros+PxSg3: пумнанда 
     пуна+POSTP_Pros+PxDu1: пумнаниʼ
     пуна+POSTP_Pros+PxDu2: пумнандиʼ
     пуна+POSTP_Pros+PxDu3: пумнандиʼ
     пуна+POSTP_Pros+PxPl1: пумнанаˮ
     пуна+POSTP_Pros+PxPl2: пумнандаˮ
     пуна+POSTP_Pros+PxPl3: пумнадоʼ
